District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Pied-a-Terre Property Tax Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as follows:
(a) Section 47-802 is amended by adding a new paragraph (19) to read as follows:
“(19) The term “Class 1C Property cost-of-living adjustment” for any real property tax
year means $2,500,000 multiplied by the difference between the Consumer Price Index for the
preceding tax year and the Consumer Price Index for the tax year 2024 divided by the Consumer
Price Index for tax year 2024. For the purposes of this paragraph, the Consumer Price Index for
any real property tax year is the average of the Consumer Price Index for the Washington-
Baltimore Metropolitan Statistical Area for all urban consumers published by the Department of


Labor, or any successor index, as of the close of the 12-month period ending on September 30 of
such tax year.”
(b) Section 47-812 is amended by adding a new subsection (b-13) to read as follows:
“(b-14)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the provisions
of this subsection shall apply for tax year 2025 and each tax year thereafter.
“(2) The sum of the real property tax rates and special real property tax rates for
taxable Class 1A Property in the District of Columbia for tax year 2025, and each tax year
thereafter, shall be $0.85 of each $100 of taxable assessed value.
“(3)(A) The sum of the real property tax rates and special real property tax rates
for taxable Class 1B Property in the District of Columbia for tax year 2025, and each tax year
thereafter, shall be:
“(i) For the first $2,500,000 of taxable assessed value, $0.85 of
each $100 of taxable assessed value; and
“(ii) For the portion of the taxable assessed value above
$2,500,000, $1.00 of each $100 of taxable assessed value.
“(B) Beginning with tax year 2026, the threshold amount set forth in
subparagraph (A)(i) and (ii) of this paragraph shall be increased annually by the Class 1B
Property cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $1,000,
rounded to the next lowest multiple of $1,000).
“(4)(A) The sum of real property tax rates and special real property tax rates for
taxable Class 1C Property in the District of Columbia for tax year 2027, and each tax year
thereafter, shall be:
“(i) For properties with a taxable assessed value of $2,500,000 (as


adjusted by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph beginning with tax year 2027) or less, $0.85 of
each $100 of taxable assessed value; and
“(ii) For properties with a taxable assessed value greater than
$2,500,000 (as adjusted by subparagraph (B) of this paragraph beginning with tax year 2027)
$2.50 of each $100 of taxable assessed value.
“(B) Beginning with tax year 2027, the threshold amount set forth in
subparagraph (A)(i) and (ii) of this paragraph shall be increased annually by the Class 1C
Property cost-of-living adjustment (if the adjustment does not result in a multiple of $1,000,
rounded to the next lowest multiple of $1,000).
“(C) This paragraph shall not apply to real property if the owner proves to
the Mayor that:
“(i) There is construction in progress on the property during the tax
year that prevents the owner or tenant from occupying the property for 6 or more months;
provided that this exception may be claimed in no more than two out of every 5 years;
“(ii) It is inhabited by a tenant subject to a long-term rental
agreement at market rates for at least 9 months of the year and the owner does not occupy the
property on any day of the year; provided that the property may be used as a rental unit pursuant
to an unexpired rental housing business license;
“(iii) It was advertised for sale or rent at market rates for no more
than nine months of the year and the owner does not occupy the property on any day of the year;
or,
“(iv) The owner is any elective officer of the government of the
United States or any employee on the staff of an elected official in the legislative branch of the


government of the United States if the employee is a bona fide resident of the state of residence
of the elected officer, or any officer of the executive branch of the government whose
appointment was made by the President of the United States and subject to confirmation by the
Senate of the United States and whose tenure of office is at the pleasure of the President of the
United States, or any Justice of the Supreme Court of the United States, unless the officer,
employee, or justice is domiciled within the District at any time during the taxable year.
“(D) The notice of assessment to each owner of Class 1C Property shall
include an explanation of the classification.
“(E) A property not classified as a Class 1C Property under this paragraph
shall be subject to classification under paragraph (3) of this section.
“(F) An owner who timely challenges the applicability of this paragraph to
a property, and timely pays assessed property taxes under this subsection, shall not be assessed
late fees on the difference until 30 days after the Mayor has delivered a final response on that
challenge or June 30 of the following year, whichever is earlier;
“(5)(A) Beginning with tax year 2027, the Mayor shall compute the real property
tax rates (rounded up to the nearest penny) for Class 1A, 1B, and 1C Properties calculated to
yield in that tax year the same amount of taxes for each class estimated to be collected during the
preceding tax year, plus the lesser of:
“(i) Seven percent; or
“(ii) The percentage increase in the total aggregate assessment of
100 taxable real property for Class 1A, 1B, or 1C Properties.
101 “(B) By January 5 of the applicable tax year, the Mayor shall submit to the
102 Council the real property tax rates computed under this paragraph.


103 “(6) For the purposes of this subsection,
104 “(A) “Construction in progress” shall have the same meaning as provided
105 in § 47-830 (d)(2);
106 “(B) “Long-term rental agreement” means a fully executed lease
107 agreement for the entirety of the habitable property for a period of not less than 12 months, or a
108 month-to-month agreement established after the end of the tenancy created by such a lease;
109 “(C) “Occupy” means to sleep in the property for a contiguous period of
110 six hours or more.”
111 (c) Section 47-813 is amended by adding a new subsection (c-10) to read as follows:
112 “(c-10)(1) For tax year 2027 and thereafter, the following classes of taxable real property
113 are established:
114 “(A) Class 1A Property;
115 “(B) Class 1B Property;
116 “(C) Class 1C Property;
117 “(D) Class 2 Property;
118 “(E) Class 3 Property;
119 “(F) Class 4 Property;
120 “(2)(A) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and subject to paragraphs
121 (4) and (5) of this subsection, Class 1A Property shall be comprised of residential real property
122 that is improved and its legal use is for nontransient residential dwelling purposes, and that is not
123 Class 1B Property or Class 1C Property; provided, that such property may be used to host
124 transient guests pursuant to an unexpired short-term rental license endorsement issued pursuant
125 to § 30-201.04.


126 “(B) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and subject to
127 paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection, Class 1B property shall be comprised of residential real
128 property that is improved and its legal use is for nontransient residential dwelling purposes with
129 no more than two dwelling units (excluding any housing cooperative), whether as a row, semi-
130 detached, or detached structure, or comprising no more than 2 contiguous condominium units
131 under common ownership, and that is not Class 1C property; provided, that such property may
132 be used to host transient guests pursuant to an unexpired short-term rental license endorsement
133 issued pursuant to § 30-201.04.
134 “(C) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and subject to
135 paragraphs (4) and (5) of this subsection, Class 1C property shall be comprised of residential real
136 property that is improved and its legal use is for nontransient residential dwelling purposes with
137 no more than two dwelling units (excluding any housing cooperative), whether as a row, semi-
138 detached, or detached structure, or comprising no more than 2 contiguous condominium units
139 under common ownership, and for which a homestead deduction is not claimed pursuant to § 47-
140 850 of the District of Columbia Official Code.”.
141 Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
142 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
143 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
144 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
145 Sec. 4. Effective date.
146 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
147 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review


148 as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
149 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).